Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3529
Homestead; exemption; application; denied; other exemption allowed.

If any application for exemption pursuant to sections 77-3501 to 77-3529 is denied and the applicant would be qualified for any other exemption under such sections, then such denied application shall be treated as an application for the highest exemption for which qualified. Any additional documentation necessary for such other exemption shall be submitted to the county assessor within a reasonable time after receipt of the notice of denial.

Laws 1979, LB 65, § 29;

Laws 1983, LB 195, § 10;

Laws 1984, LB 809, § 14;

Laws 1987, LB 376A, § 18;

Laws 1989, LB 84, § 17;

Laws 1994, LB 902, § 43;

Laws 2014, LB1087, § 20;

Laws 2024, LB126, § 10.